Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5099.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 3. As used in this act:
(a) "Accommodations" means the room or other space provided to
transient guests for dwelling, lodging, or sleeping, including
furnishings and other accessories, in a facility that is not a
campground, hospital, nursing home, emergency shelter, or community
mental health or community substance abuse treatment facility.
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


Accommodations do not include food or beverages.
(b) "Commissioner" means the state treasurer.
(b) (c) "Convention facility" means 1 or more facilities owned
or leased by a local governmental unit or metropolitan authority
created under the regional convention facility authority act, 2008
PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379, that are any combination of a
convention hall, auditorium, meeting rooms, and exhibition areas
that are separate and distinct and contiguous to each other, and
related adjacent public areas generally available to members of the
public for lease on a short-term basis for holding conventions,
meetings, exhibits, and similar events and the necessary site or
sites, together with appurtenant properties necessary and
convenient for use in connection with the facility. Convention
facility includes a qualified convention facility as defined under
section 5 of the regional convention facility authority act, 2008
PA 554, MCL 141.1355.
(c) "Convention facility development fund" means the
convention facility development fund created in section 8.
(d) "Convention hotel" means a facility used in the business
of providing accommodations that has more than 80 rooms for
providing accommodations to transient guests and that complies with
all of the following:
(i) Is located within a county having a population according to
the most recent decennial census of 700,000 or more.
(ii) Is located within a county that is 1 or more of the
following:
(A) A county that has a convention facility with 350,000
square feet or more of total exhibit space.
(B) A county that has 2,000 or more rooms to provide
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


accommodations for transient guests.
(e) "Debt obligation" means any bonds, obligations, or other
evidences of indebtedness, including payments under a public-
private arrangement, and the refunding or restructuring of any
bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness.
(f) (e) "Local governmental unit" means a county, township,
city, village, or a metropolitan authority formed under the
regional convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL
141.1351 to 141.1379.
(g) (f) "Person" means a natural person, partnership, limited
partnership, fiduciary, association, corporation, limited liability
company, or other entity.
(h) (g) "Public-private arrangement" means a public-private
arrangement authorized under the regional convention facility
authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379.
(i) "Qualified local governmental unit" means, except as
otherwise provided in this subdivision, a city, village, township,
county, or authority that is located in, or includes within its
territory or jurisdiction, a county in which convention hotels are
located and that either is the owner or lessee of a convention
facility with 350,000 square feet or more of total exhibit space on
July 30, 1985 or, if such a convention facility does not exist,
will be the owner or lessee of a convention facility with 350,000
square feet or more of total exhibit space through the application
of distributions under section 9 to the purchase or lease of a
convention facility. Qualified local governmental unit includes a
metropolitan authority that leases, develops, operates, and
maintains a qualified convention facility under the regional
convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


141.1379. If the transfer and lease of a qualified convention
facility to an authority is disapproved and the authority is
dissolved under section 19(1) of the regional convention facility
authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1369, then for purposes of any
distribution from the convention facility development of proceeds
under section 5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund act, 1987 PA
264, MCL 141.475, qualified local governmental unit means a
building authority for a county having a population of not less
than 1,000,000 and not more than 1,500,000 according to the most
recent federal decennial census.
(j) (h) "Room charge" means the charge imposed for the use or
occupancy of accommodations, excluding charges for food, beverages,
telephone services, the use tax imposed under the use tax act, 1937
PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, or like services paid in connection
with the charge. Room charge does not include reimbursement of the
assessment imposed by the community convention or tourism marketing
act, 1980 PA 395, MCL 141.871 to 141.880, the convention and
tourism marketing act, 1980 PA 383, MCL 141.881 to 141.889, or this
act.
(k) (i) "Transient guest" means a natural person staying less
than 30 consecutive days.
Sec. 4. (1) There is hereby levied upon and there shall be
collected from any person engaged in the business of providing
accommodations to transient guests in a convention hotel, whether
or not membership is required, an excise tax at the following
rates:
(a) For a convention hotel located within a qualified local
governmental unit, under section 9(4), the following:
(i) A rate of 3% of the room charge for accommodations in a
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


convention hotel with 81 to 160 rooms.
(ii) A rate of 6% of the room charge for accommodations in a
convention hotel with more than 160 rooms.
(b) For all other convention hotels not subject to the tax
rates imposed by subdivision (a), the following:
(i) A rate of 1.5% of the room charge for accommodations in a
convention hotel with 81 to 160 rooms.
(ii) A rate of 5% of the room charge for accommodations in a
convention hotel with more than 160 rooms.
(2) Beginning with the state fiscal year 1987, a A person
engaged in the business of providing accommodations to transient
guests in a convention hotel is exempt from the tax imposed by this
act for any state fiscal year in which appropriations of the tax
collections pursuant to this act from that convention hotel have
not been made for distributions pursuant to under section 9 that
would be received by a qualified local governmental unit from the
collections of the tax under this act or section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207,
that the qualified local governmental unit is eligible to receive.
Sec. 9. (1) Except as provided in subsection (5) or (6), (4),
on or before the thirtieth day of each month, the state treasurer
shall make a distribution from the convention facility development
fund to a qualified local governmental unit. The distribution shall
must be an amount equal to the sum of the collections from the
excise tax levied for accommodations under this act for the
previous month from the convention hotels in the county in which
the convention facility is or is to be located and in any county in
which convention hotels are located that is contiguous to the
county in which the convention facility is located, or is to be
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


located, the additional tax imposed under section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, for
the previous month received in the fund, and any distribution
received under section 5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund act,
1987 PA 264, MCL 141.475, and from the 21st century jobs trust fund
under section 8(4). However, distributions for any state fiscal
year to any qualified local governmental unit under this section
shall must not exceed an amount equal to the amount pledged,
assigned, or dedicated by the qualified local governmental unit for
the payment during that state fiscal year of bonds, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations incurred pursuant
to this act or the regional convention facility authority act, 2008
PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379, other than payments under a
public-private arrangement, plus any amount necessary to maintain a
fully funded debt reserve or other reserves intended to secure the
principal and interest on the bonds, obligations, or other
evidences of indebtedness debt obligations as contained in the
resolution or ordinance authorizing their issuance. No later than
the date on which the issuance, reissuance, or refunding of a debt
obligation is authorized or 90 days before the issuance,
reissuance, or refunding of a debt obligation, whichever is later,
the qualified local governmental unit must provide notice to the
department of treasury, speaker of the house of representatives,
and senate majority leader of such issuance, reissuance, or
refunding and a preliminary debt schedule demonstrating compliance
with section 12(2)(b). Not later than 10 days after the closing on
the issuance, reissuance, or refunding of a debt obligation, the
qualified local governmental unit must provide the department of
treasury, speaker of the house of representatives, and senate
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


majority leader with a revised debt service schedule demonstrating
compliance with section 12(2)(b). In the event distributions
provided to the qualified local governmental unit under this
subsection for the state fiscal year exceed the amount required for
payment during the state fiscal year on debt obligations, both of
the following apply:
(a) The department of treasury shall notify the qualified
local governmental unit of the amount required to be remitted back
to the department of treasury for appropriate redistribution under
this act.
(b) The qualified local governmental unit shall remit to the
department of treasury the amount included in the notification
received under subdivision (a) not later than 30 days after
receiving that notice.
(2) Notwithstanding the distributions provided by subsection
(1), if a local governmental unit becomes a qualified local
governmental unit entitled to receive distributions from the tax
imposed under section 1207 of the Michigan liquor control code of
1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, or from the tax imposed by this act
in counties in which the convention facility is located or in a
county in which a convention hotel is located that is contiguous to
the county in which the convention facility is located, and from
any distribution under section 5(b)(iii) of the health and safety
fund act, 1987 PA 264, MCL 141.475, no other qualified local
governmental unit is entitled to distributions pursuant to this
section for which that qualified local governmental unit has
previously become entitled, until such time as that qualified local
governmental unit ownership or leasehold interest described in
subsection (3) is transferred to another local governmental unit.
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


If that transfer renders the transferee a qualified local
governmental unit, the transferee is, immediately upon that
transfer, entitled to the distributions to a qualified local
governmental unit provided in subsection (1) and the priority
provided to a qualified local governmental unit in this subsection,
notwithstanding that the amount of the distributions may increase
as a result of that transfer. A transfer under this subsection
includes a transfer that occurs on a transfer date under the
regional convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL
141.1351 to 141.1379.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2), if the
transfer and lease of a qualified convention facility to an
authority is disapproved and the authority is dissolved under
section 19(1) of the regional convention facility authority act,
2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1369, then a distribution from the convention
facility development fund of proceeds received under section
5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund act, 1987 PA 264, MCL
141.475, shall must be made to a building authority for a county
having a population of not less than 1,000,000 and not more than
1,500,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census for
the purpose of developing, leasing, or operating a convention
facility as defined in this act and no other qualified local
governmental unit is entitled to any distribution of proceeds
received under section 5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund act,
1987 PA 264, MCL 141.475.
(4) As used in this act, "qualified local governmental unit"
means, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a city,
village, township, county, or authority that is located in, or
includes within its territory or jurisdiction, a county in which
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


convention hotels are located and that either is the owner or
lessee of a convention facility with 350,000 square feet or more of
total exhibit space on July 30, 1985 or, if such a convention
facility does not exist, will be the owner or lessee of a
convention facility with 350,000 square feet or more of total
exhibit space through the application of distributions under this
section to the purchase or lease of a convention facility.
Qualified local governmental unit includes a metropolitan authority
that leases, develops, operates, and maintains a qualified
convention facility under the regional convention facility
authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379. If the
transfer and lease of a qualified convention facility to an
authority is disapproved and the authority is dissolved under
section 19(1) of the regional convention facility authority act,
2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1369, then for purposes of any distribution
from the convention facility development of proceeds under section
5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund act, 1987 PA 264, MCL
141.475, qualified local governmental unit means a building
authority for a county having a population of not less than
1,000,000 and not more than 1,500,000 according to the most recent
federal decennial census.
(5) Before the 2015-2016 fiscal year, collections from the
excise tax levied for accommodations under this act and collections
from the tax imposed under section 1207 of the Michigan liquor
control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, shall not be paid
to a qualified local governmental unit for the repayment of bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness incurred after
2007.
(4) (6) Beginning in fiscal year 2015-2016, and each fiscal
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


year thereafter, if a transfer and a lease of a qualified
convention facility is disapproved and an authority is dissolved
under section 19(1) of the regional convention facility authority
act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1369, then the collections from the
excise tax levied for accommodations under this act shall must be
distributed to each county in which it was levied based on the
amount collected in that county. However, if an excise tax for
accommodations is levied in a qualified city at a rate greater than
the rate levied in that portion of the county in which the
qualified city is not located, the qualified city shall receive the
collections of the excise tax for accommodations in an amount equal
to the difference between the rate levied in the qualified city and
the rate levied in that portion of the county in which the
qualified city is not located. The funds described in this
subsection are not available for a distribution of subsection (1).
As used in this subsection, "qualified city" means that term as
defined in section 5 of the regional convention facility authority
act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1355.
(5) (7) If a building authority becomes a qualified local
governmental unit, under subsection (4), collections from
distributions under section 5(b)(iii) of the health and safety fund
act, 1987 PA 264, MCL 141.475, shall be paid by the state treasurer
on or before the thirtieth day of each month to that building
authority.
Sec. 10. (1) Any money remaining in the convention facility
development fund after distributions under subsection (5) and
section 9 shall must be distributed pursuant to under subsection
(2).
(2) Money remaining in the convention facility development
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


fund shall must be distributed as provided in subsection (4) in the
following order of priority in the following amounts:
(a) For each of the following fiscal years through the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2025, the following amounts shall must be
distributed to a metropolitan authority created under the regional
convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to
141.1379, for the operational deficit costs of a qualified
convention facility operated by the authority under that act for
purposes authorized under that act:
(i) $5,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2020.
(ii) $7,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2020 for the impact on operational costs resulting from the COVID-
19 virus and related measures to protect public safety.
(iii) $8,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2021.
(iv) $8,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2022.
(v) $7,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2023.
(vi) $6,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2024.
(vii) $5,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2025.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for
fiscal years beginning after September 30, 2016 through the fiscal
year ending September 30, 2025, an amount equal to the product of
the amount of distributions of the tax collected under section 1207
of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


436.2207, in the immediately preceding fiscal year multiplied by
1.01, not to exceed the total amount of tax collected under section
1207 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL
436.2207, shall in the current fiscal year must be distributed to
counties. For the fiscal years year ending September 30, 2023 ,
September 30, 2026, September 30, 2029, September 30, 2032,
September 30, 2035, and September 30, 2038, and for the fiscal
years beginning after September 30, 2025, the amount distributed to
counties under this subdivision shall must equal the amount of the
tax collected under section 1207 of the Michigan liquor control
code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in the immediately
preceding fiscal year not to exceed the total amount of tax
collected under section 1207 of the Michigan liquor control code of
1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in the current fiscal year.
Distributions to each county under this subdivision shall must be
calculated as follows:
(i) The amount of money available to be distributed under this
subdivision multiplied by the percentage of collections in the
immediately preceding state fiscal year under section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207,
from licensees in counties in which convention hotels are not
located shall must be distributed to each county in which
convention hotels are not located in the same proportion that the
amount of tax collected pursuant to under section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in
the immediately preceding state fiscal year from licensees in that
county bears to the total tax collections from section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in
the immediately preceding state fiscal year from all counties in
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


which convention hotels are not located.
(ii) The amount of money available to be distributed under this
subdivision multiplied by the percentage of collections in the
immediately preceding state fiscal year under section 1207 of the
Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207,
from licensees in counties in which convention hotels are located
shall must be distributed to each county in which convention hotels
are located in the same proportion that the amount of tax collected
pursuant to under section 1207 of the Michigan liquor control code
of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in the immediately preceding
state fiscal year from licensees in that county bears to the total
tax collections from section 1207 of the Michigan liquor control
code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.2207, in the immediately
preceding state fiscal year from all counties in which convention
hotels are located. However, in the calculation of calculating the
proportion represented by a county's share of distributions under
this subparagraph, the amount of the tax collected from licensees
in the qualified local governmental unit that received
distributions under section 9 in the 2007-2008 state fiscal year
shall must not be included.
(c) For the fiscal years beginning after September 30, 2025,
the following amounts must be distributed to a metropolitan
authority created under the regional convention facility authority
act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379, for the operational
deficit costs of a qualified convention facility operated by the
authority under that act for purposes authorized under that act:
(i) $6,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2026.
(ii) $6,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


2027.
(iii) $5,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2028.
(iv) $5,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2029.
(v) $4,000,000.00 for the fiscal year ending September 30,
2030.
(d) (c) For each fiscal year beginning with the fiscal year
ending on September 30, 2020 through the fiscal year ending on
September 30, 2039, if the fiscal year revenue in the convention
facility development fund exceeds the amount amounts distributed
under section 9, subsection (5), and any distributions under
subdivisions (a), and (b), up to and (c), not more than
$5,000,000.00 must be distributed to the operator of a street
railway system for the operations of a street railway system as
that term is defined in section 507 of the recodified tax increment
financing act, 2018 PA 57, MCL 125.4507.
(d) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2021 only, if the
revenue in the convention facility development fund exceeds the
amount distributed under section 9, subsection (5), and any
distributions under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), up to
$4,000,000.00 must be distributed from the convention facility
development fund to the Michigan strategic fund created under the
Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2001 to 125.2094,
for the purpose of awarding grants to convention centers negatively
impacted by the COVID-19 virus and related measures to protect
public safety. All the following apply to the grant program
described in this subdivision:
(i) The Michigan strategic fund shall develop an application
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


process by December 1, 2020 and award grants under this subdivision
no later than May 1, 2021.
(ii) An eligible convention center under this subdivision
includes only a publicly owned facility of at least 10,000 square
foot that is generally available to members of the public for lease
or rental on a short-term basis for holding conventions, meetings,
exhibits, and similar events, and that has any combination of
convention hall, auditorium, meeting rooms, and exhibition areas
that are separate and distinct and contiguous to each other, and
that does not receive funding under subdivision (a).
(iii) The Michigan strategic fund cannot award more than
$1,000,000.00 to any 1 eligible convention center under this
subdivision.
(iv) An eligible convention center receiving funding under this
subdivision must report how the grant dollars were spent by
September 30, 2021 or return the funds.
(e) For each fiscal year beginning after September 30, 2025
through the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2039, if the fiscal
year revenue in the convention facility development fund exceeds
the amounts distributed under section 9, subsection (5), and
subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), for the fiscal year, not more than
$1,000,000.00 must be deposited in the health and safety fund
created in section 3 of the health and safety fund act, 1987 PA
264, MCL 141.473, and distributed as provided under section 5(b)(i)
and (ii) of the health and safety fund act, 1987 PA 264, MCL
141.475.
(f) (e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), (g),
beginning with the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2016, and
each fiscal year thereafter other than the fiscal year ending
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


September 30, 2020, if the revenue in the convention facility
development fund exceeds the amounts distributed under section 9,
subsection (5), and the distributions under subdivisions (a), (b),
(c), and (d), and (e), the excess must be distributed to a
qualified local governmental unit that is a metropolitan authority
under the regional convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554,
MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379, to be used by that qualified local
governmental unit only for costs of a metropolitan authority for
purposes authorized under this act or the regional convention
facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379,
capital expenditures, including payments under a public-private
arrangement, or the retirement of outstanding bonds, obligations,
or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations incurred for
which distributions under section 9 are pledged and for a qualified
governmental unit that is a metropolitan authority.
(g) (f) For the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2021 and
the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2022, the amount
distributed under subdivision (e) (f) from the convention facility
development fund to a qualified local governmental unit that is a
metropolitan authority to be used by that qualified local
governmental unit only for the retirement of outstanding bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness incurred must not
exceed $5,000,000.00.
(g) For the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2020, if the
revenue in the convention facility development fund exceeds the
amounts distributed under section 9, subsection (5), and the
distributions under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), the excess
must be distributed to a qualified local governmental unit to be
reserved for expenditures authorized by the regional convention
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379. For
the fiscal year ending on September 30, 2021 and the fiscal year
ending on September 30, 2022, if the revenue in the convention
facility development fund exceeds the amounts distributed under
section 9 and the distributions under subdivisions (a) to (e), the
excess must be distributed to a qualified local governmental unit
to be reserved for expenditures authorized by the regional
convention facility authority act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to
141.1379.
(3) A distribution to a county pursuant to under this section
shall must be included for purposes of the calculations required to
be made by section 24e of the general property tax act, 1893 PA
206, MCL 211.24e. If the governing body of a taxing unit approves
the additional millage rate under section 24e of the general
property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.24e, that is due to
distributions pursuant to under this section, then an amount not
less than either of the following must be used for substance abuse
treatment within the taxing unit:
(a) 40% of the distribution under this section.
(b) The amount used for substance abuse treatment within the
taxing unit in the fiscal year ending September 30, 2022.
(4) Each year, from the revenue collected during the previous
quarter, after distributing the monthly payments under section
9(1), the state treasurer shall make quarterly distributions under
subsections (2) and (5).
(5) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2020 only, prior
to before the distributions required under subsection (2),
$10,000,000.00 of the money in the convention facility development
fund is transferred to and must be deposited into the general fund.
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


Sec. 11. (1) Refunding bonds, obligations, or other evidences
of indebtedness described in subsection (2) Debt obligations
incurred for which distributions under section 9 are pledged are
issued subject to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34,
MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, excluding sections 501(2)(d) and 503(1)
of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2501 and
141.2503.
(2) Pursuant to the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34,
MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, a local governmental unit may issue
refunding bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness
debt obligations to refund all or a portion of the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations
issued for purposes specified in this act. Except as otherwise
provided in section 12(1), if refunding bonds, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations are issued, an
assignment or pledge of distributions of taxes from the convention
facility development fund for the payment of principal or interest
on the refunded bonds, obligations, or other evidences debt
obligations shall apply, after the issuance of the refunding bonds,
only to the refunding bonds, obligations, or other evidences of
indebtedness debt obligations and to any bonds, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations that were not
refunded and to which the assignment or pledge previously applied.
(3) A local governmental unit that refunds bonds, obligations,
or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to debt obligations
under subsection (2) may dedicate distributions of taxes from the
convention facility development fund to the payment of principal,
interest, or credit support fees or other costs of issuance or of
the maintenance of any required reserves for general obligation
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt
obligations issued or to be issued for purposes specified in this
act but not pursuant to the authority granted in this act or may
reimburse itself for such payments from such distributions.
However, distributions to a local governmental unit pursuant to
under this subsection in any state fiscal year shall must not
exceed the lesser of the following:
(a) Principal, interest, or credit support fees or other costs
of issuance or of the maintenance of required reserves payable in
the state fiscal year on the bonds, obligations, or other evidences
of indebtedness debt obligations to which the distributions are
dedicated.
(b) The difference between the amount that would have been
distributed to the local governmental unit had it not issued
refunding bonds pursuant to debt obligations under subsection (2)
and the amount of distribution of taxes to which an assignment or
pledge applies under subsection (2).
(4) After September 30, 1999, taxes shall must not be
distributed from the convention facility development fund pursuant
to under subsection (3).
(5) If bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness
debt obligations are to be issued for the purposes set forth in
section 8(2), for which all or a portion of the distribution of
taxes that the local governmental unit is eligible to receive are
pledged or assigned as set forth in subsection (1) or (2), and if
as a direct result of the acquiring, constructing, improving,
enlarging, renewing, replacing, or in conjunction with these
activities, repairing, furnishing, equipping, or leasing of a
convention facility financed from the proceeds of the bonds,
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, debt obligations,
it is necessary for the state to expend money from the state trunk
line fund from the proceeds of bonds issued by this state payable
from deposits into the state trunk line fund, or from direct
appropriations for the costs of relocating, constructing, or
reconstructing highways, roads, streets, or bridges, and costs
ancillary thereto, then before the issuance of the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, debt obligations,
the state treasurer shall determine that the total amount of these
costs to be paid from the state trunk line fund, from the proceeds
of bonds or notes payable from deposits into the state trunk line
fund, or from direct appropriations of this state, excluding any of
the cost to be reimbursed to this state by the federal government,
any local unit of government or authority or agency thereof, or any
other person or entity, shall must not exceed 25% of the total cost
of the relocation, construction, or reconstruction of highways,
roads, streets, and bridges, and costs ancillary to those costs,
directly resulting from the convention facility project purposes
described in section 8(2). For purposes of the validity of the
bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, debt
obligations, the determination of the state treasurer is conclusive
as to the matters stated in the determination. If after the
determination by the state treasurer the total costs of relocating,
constructing, and reconstructing highways, roads, streets, and
bridges, and costs ancillary thereto, increase, this state shall
not expend from the state trunk line fund, from the proceeds from
bonds payable from deposits in the state trunk line fund, or from
direct appropriations of this state, any additional funds that
cause the total expenditure by this state from these sources, after
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


any reimbursement, to exceed 25% of the total cost, as increased,
of the relocation, construction, and reconstruction, including
ancillary costs. An expenditure by this state in violation of this
subsection does not invalidate or otherwise adversely affect any
previously issued bonds, obligations, or other evidences of
indebtedness debt obligations described in this section or any
security therefor.
(6) As used in this section, "state trunk line fund" means the
state trunk line fund created in section 11 of 1951 PA 51, MCL
247.661.
Sec. 12. (1) A local governmental unit may assign or pledge
all or a portion of the distribution of taxes that the local
governmental unit is eligible to receive under this act for payment
of bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness,
including payments under a public-private arrangement, debt
obligations for the purposes specified in section 8(2). If a local
governmental unit assigns or pledges all or a portion of the
distribution of taxes that the local governmental unit is eligible
to receive under this act for payment of bonds, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness, including payments under a public-
private arrangement, debt obligations, the state treasurer may
transmit to the duly appointed trustee or trustees for the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, including a
public-private arrangement, debt obligations the payment of the
distribution assigned or pledged by the local governmental unit.
Notwithstanding anything in this act to the contrary, the second
sentence of section 11(2) does not apply to bonds issued by a
metropolitan authority that becomes a qualified local governmental
unit after December 1, 2008.
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


(2) A local governmental unit that becomes a qualified local
governmental unit before May 1, 2008 shall not issue bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness to which
distributions under section 9 are pledged in a principal amount
greater than $180,000,000.00. This limit does not apply to
refunding bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness
issued pursuant to section 11(2) or to bonds, obligations, or other
evidences of indebtedness to which distributions of taxes from the
convention facility development fund are dedicated under section
11(3). A metropolitan authority that becomes a qualified local
governmental unit after December 1, 2008 may , after the effective
date of the amendatory act that added subdivision (f), do both of
the following:
(a) After July 1, 2026, issue bonds, obligations, or other
evidences of indebtedness debt obligations to which distributions
under section 9 are pledged in an aggregate principal amount not to
exceed $299,000,000.00. if there is demonstrated compliance with
subdivision (b) prior to issuance of any debt obligation. The cost
of a project in addition to construction and acquisition costs may
include an allowance for legal, engineering, architectural, and
consulting services. The following are not subject to the
limitations set forth in this subsection:
(a) Interest on revenue obligations issued to finance the
project becoming due before the collection of the first revenues
available for the payment of those revenue obligations.
(b) A reserve for the payment of principal, interest, and
redemption premiums on the revenue obligations of the qualified
local governmental unit, and other necessary incidental expenses,
including, but not limited to, placement fees, fees or charges for
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


insurance, letters of credit, lines of credit, remarketing
agreements, or commitments to purchase obligations issued pursuant
to this act.
(c) Fees or charges associated with an agreement to manage
payment, revenue, or interest rate exposure.
(d) Any other fees or charges for any other security provided
to assure timely payment of the obligations.
(e) Refunding bonds.
(f) Payments under a public-private arrangement.
(b) After July 1, 2026, may issue debt obligations to which
distributions under section 9 are pledged, if the percentage rate
of change in aggregate annual debt service of the qualified local
governmental unit, based on the state's fiscal year, taking into
account such additional debt obligations, does not exceed the
average annual rate of change of actual collections from the excise
tax levied for accommodations under this act over the immediately
preceding 10 state fiscal years or 5%, whichever is less. In
calculating the total aggregate maximum annual debt service, each
debt obligation must fully amortize within 40 years from the date
of issuance.
Sec. 14. Bonds, obligations, or other evidences of
indebtedness Debt obligations of the local governmental unit issued
for the purposes specified in this act shall are not be in any way
a debt or liability of the state and shall do not create or
constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state
or be or constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the state.
However, all bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness
debt obligations issued by the local governmental unit for the
purposes specified in this act, unless paid or refunded by bonds,
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations of
a local governmental unit, shall must be payable from the funds
pledged or available for their payment as authorized in this act or
as otherwise provided by law. Each bond, obligation, or other
evidence of indebtedness debt obligation issued for the purposes
specified in this act shall must contain on its face a statement to
the effect that the local governmental unit is obligated to pay the
principal, of the premium, if any, and the interest on the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations
from distributions under this act or as otherwise provided by law,
that the state is not obligated to pay the principal of, the
premium, if any, and the interest on the bonds, obligations, or
other evidences of indebtedness, debt obligations, and that neither
the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state is pledged
to the payment of the principal of, the premium, if any, and the
interest on the bonds, obligations, or other evidences of
indebtedness debt obligations issued by the local governmental
unit.
Sec. 15. (1) The state pledges to and agrees with the holders
of bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt
obligations issued by a local governmental unit in accordance with
law that the state shall not limit or restrict the rights vested in
any person or local governmental unit to do any 1 or more of the
following:
(a) Establish and collect fees or other charges as are
convenient or necessary to produce sufficient revenues to meet the
expenses of the local governmental unit for operating the
convention facilities.
(b) Fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the holders
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd


of bonds, obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt
obligations issued by the local governmental unit, or in any way
impair the rights or remedies of the holders of bonds, obligations,
or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations issued by the
local governmental unit until the principal amount of the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness, debt obligations,
together with interest, and premiums, if any, on the bonds,
obligations, or other evidences of indebtedness debt obligations
and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs
and expenses in connection with an action or proceedings by or on
behalf of the holders are fully met, paid, and discharged.
(2) This section shall not be construed to does not obligate
or restrict any future legislature to make or from making the
appropriation of distributions made under this act and shall not be
construed to does not limit or prohibit the state from repealing or
amending any law enacted for the imposition of taxes being
distributed by this act.
Sec. 20. The tax imposed by this act shall not must be levied
after the earlier of December 31, 2039 or until 30 days after all
bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued by a metropolitan
authority formed under the regional convention facility authority
act, 2008 PA 554, MCL 141.1351 to 141.1379, for purposes authorized
under that act are retired.
Final Page
ERE H01924'25 (H-4) 1bgsrd